Utah statutes.
76-10-1306.   Aggravated exploitation of prostitution.

(1)  A person is guilty of aggravated exploitation if:

(a)  in committing an act of exploiting prostitution, as defined in Section 76-10-1305, the person uses any force, threat, or fear against any person;

(b)  the person procured, transported, or persuaded or with whom the person shares the proceeds of prostitution is a child or is the spouse of the actor; or

(c)  in the course of committing exploitation of prostitution, a violation of Section 76-10-1305, the person commits human trafficking or human smuggling, a violation of Section 76-5-308.

(2)  Aggravated exploitation of prostitution is a second degree felony, except under Subsection (3).

(3)  Aggravated exploitation of prostitution involving a child is a first degree felony.



Amended by Chapter 196, 2013 General Session

